Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0868.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of lifelong
education, advancement, and potential for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT,
AND POTENTIAL
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated exempted positions 342.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 657,672,900
Interdepartmental grant revenues: 0
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 0
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 657,672,900
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues: 418,323,900
Total private revenues 1,000,000
Total other state restricted revenues 1,897,300
State general fund/general purpose $ 236,451,700
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 37.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 6.0 $ 1,029,500
Executive direction and operations--FTEs 37.0 7,458,100
Property management 165,500
Worker's compensation 3,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,656,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 1,174,400
Total federal revenues 1,174,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 7,482,400
Sec. 103. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 1,021,700
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,021,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 227,600
Total federal revenues 227,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 794,100
Sec. 104. OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
Full-time equated classified positions 233.0
Child care licensing and regulation--FTEs 167.0 $ 30,457,600
Child development and care contracted services 22,900,000
Child development and care external support 11,074,100
Child development and care public assistance 503,312,000
Head start collaboration office--FTE 1.0 427,700
Office of great start operations--FTEs 65.0 17,984,700
Tri-share child care program 3,400,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 589,556,100
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Federal funds 325,831,100
Social security act, temporary assistance for
needy families 89,755,300
Total federal revenues 415,586,400
Special revenue funds:
Private foundations 1,000,000
Certification fees 64,600
Child care home and center licenses fund 501,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 172,403,400
Sec. 105. OFFICE OF EDUCATION PARTNERSHIPS
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


Full-time equated classified positions 21.0
Before and after school administration--FTEs 2.0 $ 372,300
Camp licensing unit--FTEs 7.0 719,500
Family and community engagement--FTEs 12.0 2,410,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,501,800
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 1,335,500
Total other state restricted revenues 44,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,122,100
Sec. 106. OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
Full-time equated classified positions 51.0
Student financial assistance programs--FTEs 51.0 9,936,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,936,500
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Michigan merit award trust fund 1,286,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 8,649,700
Sec. 107. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Child development and care public assistance $ 40,000,000
Childcare funding 1,000,000
Michigan college success 2,000,000
Reenrollment services 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000
Appropriated from:
State general fund/general purpose $ 45,000,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$238,349,000.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential.
(b) "DHHS" means the Michigan department of health and human
services.
(c) "Director" means the director of the department.
(d) "FTE" means full-time equated position in the classified
service of this state.
(e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(f) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house
appropriations subcommittee on the department, the senate and house
fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state
budget office.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department or agency shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the house and senate
appropriations committees. The report must include all of the
following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related expenses of each
travel occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of
the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


appropriated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under
this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have
been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $350,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this
subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been
transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of
the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each
department or agency:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1 shall
take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. Each director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department or agency contracts to
subcontract with certified geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises for services, supplies, or both.
Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, a department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall report on the number of
FTEs in pay status by type of staff and civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of FTEs authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual
number of FTEs employed by the department or agency at the end of
the reporting period. The report must be submitted to the senate
and house appropriations committees and to the standard report
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


recipients.
Sec. 217. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 218. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, a department, an agency, and
the legislature shall submit an annual report that summarizes all
work project accounts. The report must include all of the
following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the policy change. The department shall submit
the report to the standard report recipients, to the senate and
house appropriations committees, and to the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 222. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 224. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $4,108,800.00. From this amount, total
department appropriations for pension-related legacy costs are
estimated at $4,108,800.00. Total department appropriations for
retiree health care legacy costs are estimated at $0.
Sec. 226. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
timesheets were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80 percent or higher, subject to
market conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 227. A department or agency that receives an
appropriation under this part or part 1 must provide an annual
report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue. For federal revenue reductions, the
annual report must detail the impact on the department or agency
and residents of this state, including, but not limited to, all of
the following information:
(i) The amount of additional state revenue required to replace
the lost federal revenue.
(ii) The services the department or agency will have to reduce
or eliminate due to the lost revenue.
(iii) The anticipated fiscal impact on residents of this state.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department or agency.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
(d) Increase the department's or agency's costs.
(e) Reduce or eliminate a program that provides services to
residents of this state.
Sec. 230. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 231. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 232. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount and source of funding received,
the purpose for which funding was expended, and the amount of any
remaining funds. The report must be submitted to the standard
report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house
appropriations committees.
Sec. 233. (1) Within 30 days after enactment of this act, the
house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a jointly
agreed upon list of legislatively directed spending items funded in
part 1. This list must include all information and documents
pertaining to the funded items as publicly disclosed in accordance
with sections 364 and 364a of the management and budget act, 1984
PA 431, MCL 18.1364 and 18.1364a. As used in this subsection,
"legislatively directed spending items" means that term as defined
in section 364 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1364.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 234. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 235. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purpose:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of Public Law 117-2 must be followed for state fiscal
recovery funds reallocated and reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and
house appropriations committees not later than 10 business days
after making any reallocations under subsection (1). The
notification must include the authorized program under which funds
were originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.

OFFICE OF EDUCATION PARTNERSHIPS
Sec. 401. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for family and
community engagement, the department shall, at a minimum, do all of
the following:
(a) Establish or partner with family engagement centers across
this state to increase parent and guardian involvement in their
child's education.
(b) Ensure translation and interpretation services are
available and implemented pursuant to department guidance.
(c) Partner with intermediate school districts to assist in
getting information and resources to their constituent districts.
(d) Develop an early literacy engagement plan to help parents
or guardians become involved in their child's education.

OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


Sec. 701. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, in
addition to other statutorily required duties, the department shall
do all of the following:
(a) Review and evaluate all state financial aid programs. The
department shall prioritize improving postsecondary educational
outcomes, including student completion rates, and improving
affordability of postsecondary programs in this state.
(b) Serve as the coordinating office for all agencies of the
executive branch of government that are responsible for financial
aid programs administered by this state.
(c) Survey stakeholders, including public, tribal, and private
not-for-profit colleges and universities, state departments and
agencies, and statewide postsecondary education associations on
student financial aid policy to improve this state's administration
of programs.
(d) Collaborate with the center for educational performance
and information and individual colleges and universities to ensure
streamlined and coordinated collection of data analyzing the
following:
(i) Postsecondary education costs, including a comparison to
national and regional averages.
(ii) Student enrollment.
(iii) Degree completion.
(e) Provide access to higher education institutional data
inventory on an accessible, public facing dashboard to assist
students, prospective students, and their families in making
decisions on postsecondary education.
(f) Coordinate with other state agencies and school districts
to increase utilization and awareness of postsecondary
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


opportunities, including, but not limited to, early and middle
college, dual enrollment, and private skills training scholarships.
(g) Promote, track, and provide resources to increase
completion of the free application for federal student aid.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department
shall meet, at a minimum, the following transparency requirements:
(a) Collect data necessary to complete all statutory reporting
requirements. The department shall notify the chairs of the house
and senate appropriations committees within 10 days if an entity
receiving funds from part 1 fails to comply with data collection
requirements.
(b) Maintain a link on the department's website to find data
submitted by postsecondary institutions through higher education
institutional data inventory.
(c) Maintain a link on the department's website to the center
for educational performance and information's MI School Data page
on postsecondary enrollment and completion tracking.
(3) As used in this section, "center for educational
performance and information" means the center for educational
performance and information created in section 94a of the state
school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1694a.

OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
Sec. 1002. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall ensure that the final child development and care
provider reimbursement rates are published on the department and
Great Start to Quality webpages.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, upon
receiving approval from the state budget director, the department
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


may receive and expend federal child care development block grant
funds that are at risk of lapsing back to the federal government.
The department may do this only if all of the following criteria
are met:
(a) The funds are at risk of lapsing back to the federal
government by the end of the current fiscal year.
(b) The department plans to expend the funds through a 1-time
rate increase to providers.
(c) The department makes the request to receive and expend the
grant funds to the state budget director not less than 30 days
before the expenditure of the funds.
(3) If the average cases over a 3-month period in the child
development and care program result in the current projected fiscal
year caseloads falling below the caseload agreement from the May
consensus revenue estimating conference, the department may
increase the hourly reimbursement rate to child care providers if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The level of expenditures for the remainder of the year is
estimated to be significantly below the level estimated from the
May consensus revenue estimating conference.
(b) The department plans to expend the funds through an
ongoing rate increase to providers for the remainder of the fiscal
year.
(c) The department makes this request to the state budget
director not less than 30 days before the expenditure of the funds
that includes the rate increase.
(4) Upon receiving approval from the state budget director
under subsection (2) or (3), the department must notify the senate
and house fiscal agencies of the amount being appropriated, the
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


estimated rate increase to providers, and if the rate increase to
providers is 1-time or ongoing in nature.
(5) The department may withdraw the intent to expend the funds
under subsection (2) or (3) by notifying the state budget director
in writing.
Sec. 1003. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
development and care contracted services, the department shall
create a report on all funding appropriated to contracts for the
early childhood comprehensive systems planning by this state during
the previous fiscal year. The report required under this section is
due by April 1 and must contain at least all of the following
information:
(a) Total funding appropriated to contracts for the early
childhood comprehensive systems planning by this state during the
previous fiscal year.
(b) The amount of funding for each grant awarded.
(c) The grant recipients.
(d) The activities funded by each grant.
(e) An analysis of each grant recipient's success in
addressing the development of a comprehensive system of early
childhood services and supports.
(2) All department contracts for early childhood comprehensive
systems planning must be bid out through a statewide request-for-
proposal process.
Sec. 1007. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
development and care – external support, child development and care
contracted services, and child care licensing and regulation, the
department shall create a joint report that includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


(a) The affordability of child care in this state, including,
but not limited to, the number of children eligible for and
participating in the child development and care program, the number
of children eligible for and participating in the child development
and care program for the last 5 years, and key takeaways from the
most recent market rate survey.
(b) The availability of child care in this state by county,
including, but not limited to, the number of licensed child care
providers, the change in the number of licensed child care
providers and slots over time, and the estimated demand for care.
(c) The health and safety of child care, including, but not
limited to, the 10 most common rule violations, the number of
licenses revoked and summarily suspended, and the number of license
violations for incomplete health and safety training and safe sleep
training.
(d) Any actions taken to strengthen health and safety of care,
including, but not limited to, the number of licensing consultants,
their average caseload, the number of on-site visits they complete
by provider type and region, the types of activities that are
intended to improve health and safety in licensed care, and the
number of times those activities are performed by licensing
consultants.
(e) Information on the child care licensing process,
including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(i) The number of initial applications, initial applications
denied, license renewals, and licenses allowed to expire,
aggregated by license type.
(ii) The average amount of time to approve or deny completed
applications and a description of the most common reasons
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


applications are denied.
(iii) A description of the types of complaints received, a
description of the process used to resolve complaints, the average
amount of time to complete investigations, and the percentage of
investigations completed on time.
(iv) The number of complaints received, investigated,
determined to be unsubstantiated, and that result in disciplinary
action or rule violations.
(v) The number of administrative hearing adjudications.
(f) The quality of child care, including, but not limited to,
the number of licensed providers participating in the Great Start
to Quality program and the workforce registry, the number of new
participants and how participation has changed over the last 5
years, and the number of children participating in the child
development and care program enrolled in an enhancing quality level
or higher program.
(g) Any actions taken to improve child care quality,
including, but not limited to, the number of quality consultants,
the average caseload, the number of on-site visits completed by
region, the types of activities that are intended to improve
quality and the number of times those activities are performed, and
the number of providers that have improved the provider's quality
rating since the start of the current fiscal year compared to the
same time period in the preceding fiscal year, reported as the
number of providers in each region.
(h) The child care workforce, including, but not limited to,
the number of child care professionals, average wages by role, the
number of individuals participating in the TEACH scholarship and
earning a credential, and the level of demand for staff.
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


(2) The department must post the joint report on the
department website and send the joint report to the state budget
director, the house and senate subcommittees that oversee the
department budget, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by
April 1 of the current fiscal year reflecting data for the previous
fiscal year.
Sec. 1008. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for office of
early childhood education, the department shall ensure efficient
service provision to coordinate services provided to families for
home visits, reduce duplication of state services and spending,
increase efficiencies including, if a new section 32p is added to
the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, for the fiscal year
ending September 30, 2027, the home visits funded under that
section, and work with the DHHS as necessary.
Sec. 1009. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
development and care public assistance, the income entrance
eligibility threshold for the child development and care program is
set to not more than 200% of the federal poverty guidelines.
Sec. 1011. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
development and care public assistance, for eligible children in
the child development and care program, the department shall
implement payments to providers based on enrollment rather than
based on attendance. This shall be done in a manner determined by
the department.
Sec. 1012. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for child
development and care contracted services, $1,500,000.00 must be for
the department to work in collaboration with DHHS to continue the
network of infant and early childhood mental health consultation,
which provides mental health consultation to child care providers.
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


Sec. 1025. (1) Private revenues received by the department are
appropriated upon receipt and are available for expenditure by the
department as permitted under state and federal law.
(2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private
revenues appropriated in subsection (1), the department shall
notify the standard report recipients of the receipt of the funds,
including source, purpose, and amount.
(3) The amount appropriated under subsection (1) must not
exceed $3,000,000.00.
Sec. 1030. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for the tri-
share child care program must be awarded for the continuation of
the child care facilitator program originally initiated and funded
as a pilot project in section 1047(31) of article 5 of 2020 PA 166.
(2) The department shall establish and support tri-share
regional facilitator hubs and statewide services.
(3) The department must create benchmarks for regional
facilitator hubs receiving appropriated funding.
(4) Any child care facilitator receiving funds under this
section must be a nonprofit, limited liability company, C-
corporation, S-corporation, or a sole proprietor.
(5) Child care facilitator hubs may use funds to enroll in the
tri-share child care program families living in Wisconsin but who
have a parent or caregiver who are employed in Michigan. A child
care provider providing care for a family described in this
subsection must be licensed in Michigan.
(6) The department shall award funds to ensure employer
recruitment by regional facilitator hubs and statewide program
administration. In addition, the department may provide quarterly
advances for timely provider payments. Upon conclusion of the
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


program or upon termination of any grant agreement, any unspent
award funds held by any program partner shall either be spent down
toward the state's share of child care payments or returned to the
state at the discretion of the department.
(7) The department shall innovate program and administration
options to attract Michigan employer program participation.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1101. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
reenrollment services, the department shall deliver reenrollment
services for Michigan residents with some college and no degree for
the purpose of reengaging learners to increase the number of
Michigan adults completing postsecondary degrees or credentials in
this state. If necessary, the department may contract with private
organizations with prior reenrollment work for an amount up to
$2,000,000.00 to accomplish the purpose of this section.
Sec. 1102. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan
Center for Adult College Success must continue to improve adult
postsecondary enrollment and completion under the Michigan
reconnect grant act, 2020 PA 84, MCL 390.1701 to 390.1709.
Sec. 1103. (1) The child care payment fund is created as a
restricted fund in the department of treasury to be used solely for
the administration of the child care payment program.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the child care payment fund, including,
but not limited to, federal funds, gifts, bequests, and private
donations.
(3) Money deposited into the child care payment fund must be
available for distribution by not later than January 1 of the
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92


calendar year following the distribution. The fund must not be used
to meet state match requirements for federal aid or block grants.
(4) Money available in the child care payment fund at the
close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse.
(5) Money available in the fund must not be expended without a
specific appropriation. For the FY 2026-2027 fiscal year there is
appropriated $1,000,000.00 general fund/general purpose dollars.
(6) The department shall administer the fund for auditing
purposes and expend money from the fund for the purpose of
administering this section.
(7) The department shall distribute money in the fund to
qualified providers based on the number of children under the
qualified providers' care. Providers of children who are less than
36 months of age shall receive double the amount of money
distributed under the fund. The department shall evaluate the
number of children served under this program on October 1 of each
year.
Final Page
BEG S06113'26 (S-1) n6kq92